Rhode Island statutes. Title 2 Agriculture and Forestry
Chapter 5 Federal Conservation Program

2-5-1.
Definitions.

When used in this chapter, the term:

“Department” means the department of environmental management of the state of Rhode Island.

“Director” means the director of environmental management of the state of Rhode Island.

“Secretary of agriculture” means the secretary of agriculture of the United States.

“Soil conservation and domestic allotment act” means the federal soil conservation and domestic allotment act, 16 U.S.C. § 590a et seq.

History of Section. P.L. 1955, ch. 3585, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

2-5-1

.

2-5-2.
Agency to administer state plan.

In order to carry out the purposes of the soil conservation and domestic allotment act enacted by the congress of the United States, the Rhode Island department of environmental management, referred to as the department, is designated as the agency of
the state of Rhode Island to administer any state plan authorized by this chapter which shall be approved by the secretary of agriculture of the United States, referred to as the secretary of agriculture, for the state of Rhode Island
pursuant to the provisions of the soil conservation and domestic allotment act.

History of Section. P.L. 1955, ch. 3585, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

2-5-2

.

2-5-3.
Formulation of plans — Purposes and contents.

The department is authorized, empowered, and directed to formulate and submit to the secretary of agriculture in conformity with the provisions of the soil conservation and domestic allotment act, a state plan. It shall be the purpose of each plan and
each plan shall be designed to promote any utilization of land and any farming practices that the department finds will tend, in conjunction with the operation of any other plans that may be approved for other states by the secretary
of agriculture, to preserve and improve soil fertility; to promote the economic use and conservation of land; to diminish exploitation and wasteful and unscientific use of natural soil resources; to protect rivers and waterways against
the results of soil erosion and aid in flood control; and to perform any other functions as may be defined in subsection (a) of § 7 of the soil conservation and domestic allotment act, 16 U.S.C. § 590g. Each plan shall provide for
adjustments and utilization of land, and in farming practices through agreements with producers or through other voluntary methods, and for benefit payments in connection with these agreements or voluntary methods, and for any reports
the secretary of agriculture finds necessary for the effective administration of the plan, and for ascertaining whether the plan is being carried out according to its terms.

History of Section. P.L. 1955, ch. 3585, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

2-5-3

.

2-5-4.
Acceptance and use of federal funds.

Upon the acceptance of each plan by the secretary of agriculture and his or her approval of each plan, the department is authorized and empowered to accept and receive all grants of money made pursuant to the soil conservation and domestic allotment act,
for the purpose of enabling the state to carry out the provisions of that plan. All those moneys, together with any moneys which may be appropriated by the state, shall be paid into a special fund in the state treasury to be known
as the agricultural soil conservation program fund. That fund is established, and is available to the department for expenditures necessary in carrying out the plan, including administration expenses, expenditures in connection with
educational programs and research programs in aid of the plan, and for benefit payments.

History of Section. P.L. 1955, ch. 3585, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

2-5-4

.

2-5-5.
Administrative powers of department.

In carrying out the provisions of this chapter and of each plan, the department has the power to designate administrative areas; to provide for the selection or election of local and community committees of persons participating or co-operating in the
plan; to employ any agents or agencies and to establish any agencies that it may find to be necessary; to co-operate with local and state agencies and with agencies of other states and of the federal government; to conduct or arrange
with the University of Rhode Island for the conduct of any research and educational activities in connection with the formulation and operation of the plan as may appear advisable; to enter into agreements with producers and to provide
by other voluntary methods for adjustment in the utilization of land and in farming practices, and for payments in connection with these agreements or voluntary methods, in amounts which the department determines to be fair and reasonable.
In carrying out the plan, the department and the director are authorized to delegate any of the powers conferred in this section to the agency as may be designated by the director and approved by the secretary of agriculture.

History of Section. P.L. 1955, ch. 3585, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

2-5-5

.

2-5-6.
Annual report.

The department in its annual report each year, shall cover the administration of any state plan and the operation of any state plan under this chapter, including the receipt and expenditures of funds.

History of Section. P.L. 1955, ch. 3585, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

2-5-6

.

2-5-7.
Liability and obligations of state.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed or operate to impose any financial liability upon the state as specified, and the department has no authority to incur any obligation or liability against the state under this chapter for the expenditure of funds
other than the expenditure of funds payable from the agricultural soil conservation program fund, pursuant to the appropriations made for the agricultural soil conservation program fund.

History of Section. P.L. 1955, ch. 3585, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

2-5-7

.